Rhode Island statutes. Title 36 Public Officers and Employees
Chapter 14 Code of Ethics
36-14-13.
Adjudicative powers of the commission.

The commission is hereby empowered to adjudicate the merits of allegations of violations of the Rhode Island code of ethics.

At such a hearing the commission shall have the power to compel the attendance of witnesses, require the production of evidence, and take oral or written evidence under oath or affirmation;

Each party shall have the right to be represented by legal counsel; to conduct discovery pursuant to rules, adopted by the commission in the exercise of its rulemaking authority, which shall provide for the prompt and early exchange of relevant information and otherwise protect each party from unfair surprise during the course of the proceedings; to compel attendance of witnesses; to examine and cross examine opposing witnesses; to introduce exhibits and otherwise to present any matters to the commission relevant to the complaint;

Oral evidence shall be taken only on oath or affirmation;

There shall be a presumption of innocence on the part of any person alleged to have violated the provisions of this chapter and the burden of proving that the person has violated the provisions of this chapter shall be upon those who allege the violation or violations;

The hearing shall be open to the public;

Objections to the introduction of evidence may be made and shall be noted in the record;

A stenographic record shall be made of all hearings conducted under the provisions of this section;

At the conclusion of proceedings concerning an alleged violation, the commission shall immediately begin deliberations on the evidence and then proceed to determine whether there has been a knowing and willful violation of this chapter;

No persons, other than members of the commission, and independent legal counsel for the limited purpose provided for herein, shall be present during the deliberations of the commission following any hearing conducted under this section. Counsel may not participate in deliberations of the commission. Counsel’s sole function shall be to respond to questions of law posed by commission members. A written record shall be maintained of the questions posed to counsel and counsel’s responses, which shall become part of the record of proceedings.

In order for the commission to hold a hearing there must be a quorum of five (5) members. For every two (2) members who must recuse themselves from taking part in a hearing due to a conflict, the number needed for a quorum shall be reduced by one.

In order for the commission to find that there has been a knowing and willful violation of this chapter it shall be necessary that a majority of those commissioners who attended all hearings, but in no case fewer than three (3) of the members of the commission shall vote in the affirmative to so find.

The commission, upon a finding pursuant to this section that there has been a violation of this chapter, shall issue an order by which it may:

Require that the violator cease and desist violating the provisions of this chapter;

Require that the violator file any report, statement, or other information as required by this chapter;

Require that the violator pay a civil penalty of not more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for each violation of this chapter and the pecuniary value of any unjust enrichment realized by the violator as the result of his or her violation of this chapter;

Refer the entire record of its proceedings to the attorney general; and/or

Remove the violator from his or her office or position in accordance with the provisions of §

36-14-14

, provided the violator is not subject to impeachment.

The commission shall, in the exercise of the rulemaking authority conferred by §

36-14-9(a)(3)

, promulgate rules and regulations, consistent with the provisions of this section, for the conduct of adjudicative hearings before any adjudicative panel of the commission.

Except in those cases referred to the attorney general pursuant to subsection (d)(4) of this section, a final decision of the commission and the record of proceedings before the commission upon which the final decision is based shall be made public by the commission within thirty (30) days after the final decision is rendered.

The commission, upon a finding pursuant to this section that there has not been a violation of this chapter, shall issue an order dismissing the complaint, and if it finds the complaint to be frivolous, unreasonable, or groundless, the commission shall require the person filing the complaint to pay a civil penalty of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), all or part of which may be paid to the subject of the complaint in reimbursement of said subject’s reasonable expense of defense.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 195, § 3; P.L. 1992, ch. 131, § 1; 1992, ch. 436, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 256, § 1.

36-14-14.
Removal powers of the commission.

The commission is hereby empowered to remove from office any state or municipal elected official or any state or municipal appointed official not subject to impeachment in accordance with the provisions of subsections (b) through (d) of this section.

Any state or municipal elected official and any state or municipal appointed official not subject to impeachment may be removed from office if:

The commission has found, after an adjudicative hearing conducted in accordance with §

36-14-13

, that the official has been guilty of a serious, knowing, and willful violation of §

36-14-5(c)

,

36-14-5(d)

, or

36-14-5(g)

; and

The commission determines that the violation was committed by the violator either with (i) fraudulent intent to secure the unjust enrichment of him or herself or another person or (ii) malicious intent to inflict pecuniary or other substantial injury upon another person.

If it determines that such a violation has been committed, it shall conduct a hearing at which the executive director of the commission or his or her designee and the respondent or his or her counsel shall be permitted to pursue additional evidence and arguments relevant to (i) the presence or absence of the specific intent required by subsection (b)(2) of this section as a prerequisite to removal of an official from office, and (ii) the presence or absence of aggravating or mitigating circumstances of which the commission should be aware in rendering its final decision.

The removal power conferred by this section may be exercised only by the affirmative vote of two-thirds (2/3) of the membership of the commission eligible to participate, but in no case fewer than five (5) affirmative votes.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 195, § 3; P.L. 1992, ch. 436, § 1.

36-14-15.
Judicial review.

Any action by the commission made pursuant to this chapter shall be subject to review pursuant to chapter 35 of title 42.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 195, § 3.

36-14-16.
Financial statement to be filed.

On or before the last Friday in April of each year, the following officials and employees subject to this code of ethics shall file with the commission a financial statement complying with the requirements of this chapter:

All state elected officials;

All state-appointed officials;

All state-appointed officials and employees who hold a major decision-making position in a state agency;

All municipal elected officials; and

All municipal-appointed officials whose official duties and responsibilities include exercising decision-making authority over the expenditure of more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) in public funds in any fiscal or calendar year, and expressly including solicitors and assistant solicitors, police chiefs, fire chiefs, superintendents of schools, principals, superintendents and administrators of charter schools, board members of charter schools, principals, superintendents and administrators of state schools, board members of state schools, building inspectors, members of planning boards, zoning boards, licensing boards and tax appeal boards. This subsection shall also include all municipal-appointed officials whose official duties and responsibilities include nominating, appointing, or hiring any persons who will receive compensation of more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) in public funds in any fiscal or calendar year.

In the case of state- and municipal-appointed officials on and after January 1, 1988, the appointee shall file the financial statement within thirty (30) days after the date of his or her appointment or the date he or she qualifies for the office; provided, however, that in the case of the appointment of officials who require senate confirmation, the appointee shall file the financial statement with the appropriate senate committee prior to the institution of those confirmation proceedings.

Within thirty (30) days after the filing deadline, or within thirty (30) days after filing a notice of organization or compliance with §

17-25-8

, every person who is a candidate for an office as an elected officer, except those candidates for moderator and clerk of a voting district of the cities and towns, shall file the financial statement as required by this chapter. Filings of candidates for general office shall include information as required in §

36-14-17(b)(2)

. The commission shall grant an extension for good cause shown of not more than fifteen (15) days, provided a request for the extension is received prior to the filing deadline for the financial statement.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, at least thirty (30) days before the deadline date for the filing of a financial statement by each individual required to file, the commission shall mail to the individual a copy of the financial statement form. In the case of candidates other than those covered by subsection (f) of this section, the forms shall be mailed within ten (10) days after the filing deadline date. In the case of appointed officers covered by this section, the forms shall be mailed within seven (7) days after the date of the appointment.

If a person has filed a financial statement as required by one subsection of this section covering the preceding calendar year, he or she is not required to file a financial statement as required by another subsection if, before the deadline for filing under the other subsection, he or she notifies the commission in writing that he or she has already filed a financial statement under the subsection specified.

A person required to file a financial statement under subsection (a) of this section may request the commission to grant an extension of time of not more than sixty (60) days for filing the statement. The commission shall grant the extension of not more than sixty (60) days if the request is received prior to the filing deadline or if a timely filing or request for extension is prevented because of physical or mental incapacity. Not more than one extension may be given to a person in one year except for good cause shown.

The deadline for filing any statement required by this section is 5:00 p.m. of the last day designated in the pertinent subsection of this section for filing the statement. When the last day of filing falls on a Saturday or Sunday or an official state holiday, the deadline for filing is extended to 5:00 p.m. of the next day which is not a Saturday or Sunday or holiday. Any statement required by any provision of this section to be filed within a specified time period shall be deemed to be timely filed if it is placed in the United States post office or in the hands of a common or contract carrier properly addressed to the appropriate authority within the time limits applicable to the statement. The postmark or receipt mark (if received by a common or contract carrier) will be prima facie evidence of the date that the statement was deposited with the post office or carrier. The person filing the statement may show by competent evidence that the actual date of posting was to the contrary.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 195, § 3; P.L. 2004, ch. 389, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 428, § 5; P.L. 2006, ch. 429, § 5; P.L. 2019, ch. 220, § 2; P.L. 2019, ch. 229, § 2.

36-14-17.
Content of financial statement.

The financial statement required herein shall be on a form prescribed by the commission and shall include the account of the financial activity of the person required to file the statement by this chapter, the financial activity of his or her spouse (if not estranged), and any dependent children for the preceding calendar year.

The account of financial activity referred to in subsection (a) of this section shall consist of:

If he or she or any person enumerated in subsection (a) of this section or a business entity in which he or she or any person enumerated as aforesaid held a ten percent (10%) or greater equity interest or five thousand dollars ($5,000) or greater cash value interest at any time during the calendar year for which the statement is required has done business with a state or municipal agency or a business which is subject to direct regulation greater than of a de minimus nature by a state or municipal agency, and if so, the date and nature of the business;

A list of all sources of occupational income identified by employer or, if self employed, by the nature of occupation or profession, and if income was received from a state or municipal agency, the name and address of the agency and the nature of the services rendered; however, general officers, as defined in section

17-2-1

, shall list all sources and amounts of income in excess of two hundred dollars ($200) according to the following categories:

not more than $1000

greater than $1000 but no more than $10,000

greater than $10,000 but no more than $25,000

greater than $25,000 but no more than $50,000

greater than $50,000 but no more than $100,000

greater than $100,000 but no more than $200,000

greater than $200,000 but no more than $500,000

greater than $500,000 but no more than $1,000,000

greater than $1,000,000

A listing of all real property in which a financial interest was held; however, this section shall not apply to real property used exclusively as his or her principal residence;

Identification of any interested person from whom the person or his or her spouse (if not estranged) or any dependent child received a gift or contribution of money or property in excess of one hundred dollars ($100) in value or a series of gifts or contributions of money or property, the total of which exceeds one hundred dollars ($100) in value received from the same source, and a description of each gift or contributions, except those received from persons related to the person at any time within the third degree of consanguinity or affinity and campaign contributions which were reported as required by law, for purposes of this subsection, “interested person”, means a person or a representative of a person or business that has a direct financial interest in a decision that the person subject to the Code of Ethics is authorized to make, or to participate in the making of, as part of his or her official duties;

Identification of the source of all income received as beneficiary of a trust and identification of each asset, if known to the beneficiary, from which income was received by the beneficiary in excess of one thousand dollars ($1,000);

A list of all boards of directors of which the person is a member and executive positions which he or she holds in any business entity, stating the name and address of each business entity;

The name and address of any business entity in which he or she or any person enumerated in subsection (a) of this section held a ten percent (10%) or greater equity interest or five thousand dollars ($5,000) or greater cash value interest in at any time during the calendar year for which the statement is required; and

Identification of any person, business entity, financial institution or other organization to whom the person was indebted at any time during the calendar year for which the statement is required in an amount in excess of one thousand dollars ($1,000) other than:

Any person related to the person at any time within the third degree of consanguinity or affinity; or

Any transactions involving credit cards; or

Any indebtedness to a financial institution, licensed and regulated by any state or by the United States, which is secured solely by a mortgage of record on real property used exclusively as the principal residence of the person required to file the statement.

This section does not require the reporting of the amount or amounts of the indebtedness or the payment record of the loans.

The financial statement shall be sworn to under oath.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 195, § 3; P.L. 1988, ch. 141, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 96, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 272, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 181, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 248, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 428, § 5; P.L. 2006, ch. 429, § 5.

36-14-18.
Disclosure of regulated business interests.

Every person who is required to file a financial statement pursuant to this chapter and who has, acquires, or divests him or herself of ten percent (10%) or greater equity interest or five thousand dollars ($5,000) or greater cash value interest in a business entity which is subject to direct regulation, greater than of a de minimus nature, by a state or municipal agency, or which does any business with a state or municipal agency, shall file with the commission at the times specified by this chapter, an affidavit:

Identifying him or herself and stating the capacity in which he or she serves or is about to serve which occasions the filing of the affidavit;

Identifying the business entity (or each business entity);

Identifying the regulatory agency or agencies;

Stating the nature of his or her interest in the business entity;

Describing the manner in which the business entity is subject to regulation; and

Stating whether the interest is held, or was acquired or divested, and if acquired or divested, when.

The nature of an interest in a business entity shall be described in specific language.

Every state or municipal official to which this section applies who holds office on January 1, 1988, and who has any interest required to be reported pursuant to this section, shall file the affidavit within ninety (90) days after January 1, 1988.

If a state or municipal official to which this section applies, acquires or divests him or herself of an interest, required to be reported pursuant to this section, he or she shall file the affidavit within thirty (30) days after the date the interest was acquired or divested.

In the case of appointments made after January 1, 1988, a state or municipal official who has any interest required to be reported pursuant to this section shall file the affidavit within thirty (30) days after the date of his or her appointment or the date he or she qualifies for the office.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 195, § 3.

36-14-19.
Penalties.

Any person who knowingly and willfully violates the provisions of this chapter shall, in addition to the civil penalties provided herein, be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) and/or imprisonment for no longer than one year.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 195, § 3.

36-14-20.
Construction.

The provisions of this chapter shall be construed to be in addition to and not in substitution of any other provision of law not inconsistent herewith.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 195, § 3.

36-14-21.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter, or the application thereof to any person or circumstance, is held invalid, the validity of the remainder of the chapter and the application of the provisions to other persons and circumstances shall not be affected thereby.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 195, § 3.